Michigan, session 2025-2026, SB0824.
people of the state of michigan enact: 1 2 3 4 5 Sec. 13f. This chapter applies to the following felonies enumerated in chapter 324 of the Michigan Compiled Laws: M.C.L. Category Class Description Stat Max 324.61511 Pub trst G False oil/gas well affidavit under NREPA 5 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 324.61521(1) Pub trst G Evading rule under NREPAFalse oil/gas well record 3 324.65114(2) Pub trst F Sequestration permit violation 2 324.65114(4) Pub saf E Sequestration, endangerment 5 Enacting section 1. This amendatory act does not take effect unless all of the following bills of the 103rd Legislature are enacted into law: (a)  Senate Bill No. 822. (b) Senate Bill No. 823. (c) Senate Bill No. 825. (d) Senate Bill No. 826. (e) Senate Bill No. 827.